Massachusetts, session 194th, H4345.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 35. (a) As used in this section, “multi-user breast pump” shall mean a breast
pump that is: (i) capable of initiating and supporting milk supply; (ii) able to be used by multiple
users safely and hygienically; (iii) durable enough to be used by a mother who is expressing 8
times per day or more; (iv) is made for heavy usage with a long motor life; (v) operating using a
closed system; (vi) is capable of suction power from 0 to 300 mmHg; (vii) has a multiphase
system or the ability to customize vacuum and cycling for each user; and (viii) is run on
electricity, not batteries alone.
(b) The commission shall provide to an active or retired employee of the commonwealth
who is insured under the group insurance commission coverage for the cost of the rental and
usage of a multi-user breast pump by the mother of a newborn infant who is receiving care at an
intensive care or special care nursery, or has cardiac, neurological, or oral anomalies that prevent
of 9

direct feeding at the breast, until such time as the infant is discharged, or until the mother is no
longer pumping breastmilk. The multi-user breast pump shall be made available to the user
within 24 hours of maternal hospital discharge.
(c) The commission shall provide to an active or retired employee of the commonwealth
who is insured under the group insurance commission, and eligible for a covered multi-user
breast pump under this section, coverage for: (i) periodic replacement parts for the multi-user
breast pump including, but not limited to, connectors, valves, tubing, backflow protectors, and
flanges; (ii) breast milk storage bags; and (iii) microwave bags for sterilizing the multi-user
breast pump parts.
(d) The commission shall provide to an active or retired employee of the commonwealth
who is insured under the group insurance commission, and eligible for a covered multi-user
breast pump under this section, coverage for: (i) an initial assessment, instruction and fitting by
an International Board Certified Lactation Consultant (IBCLC); and (ii) ongoing assessment,
support and refitting as needed by an IBCLC.
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10Z the following section:-
Section 10AA. (a) As used in this section, “multi-user breast pump” shall mean a breast
pump that is: (i) capable of initiating and supporting milk supply; (ii) able to be used by multiple
users safely and hygienically; (iii) durable enough to be used by a mother who is expressing 8
times per day or more; (iv) is made for heavy usage with a long motor life; (v) operating using a
closed system; (vi) is capable of suction power from 0 to 300 mmHg; (vii) has a multiphase
of 9

system or the ability to customize vacuum and cycling for each user; and (viii) is run on
electricity, not batteries alone.
(b) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract
to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall provide coverage
for the cost of the rental and usage of a multi-user breast pump by the mother of a newborn
infant who is receiving care at an intensive care or special care nursery, or has cardiac,
neurological, or oral anomalies that prevent direct feeding at the breast, until such time as the
infant is discharged, or until the mother is no longer pumping breastmilk. The multi-user breast
pump shall be made available to the user within 24 hours of maternal hospital discharge.
(c) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract
to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall provide an
individual, who is eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump under this section, coverage for:
(i) periodic replacement parts for the multi-user breast pump including, but not limited to,
connectors, valves, tubing, backflow protectors, and flanges; (ii) breast milk storage bags; and
(iii) microwave bags for sterilizing the multi-user breast pump parts.
(d) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract
to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall provide an
individual, who is eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump under this section, coverage for:
(i) an initial assessment, instruction and fitting by an International Board Certified Lactation
of 9

Consultant (IBCLC); and (ii) ongoing assessment, support and refitting as needed and prescribed
by provider, by an IBCLC.
SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting before
section 47CCC the following section:-
Section 47AAA. (a) As used in this section, “multi-user breast pump” shall mean a breast
pump that is: (i) capable of initiating and supporting milk supply; (ii) able to be used by multiple
users safely and hygienically; (iii) durable enough to be used by a mother who is expressing 8
times per day or more; (iv) is made for heavy usage with a long motor life; (v) operating using a
closed system; (vi) is capable of suction power from 0 to 300 mmHg; (vii) has a multiphase
system or the ability to customize vacuum and cycling for each user; and (viii) is run on
electricity, not batteries alone.
(b) Any blanket or general policy of insurance described in subdivision (A), (C), or (D)
of section one hundred and ten which is issued or subsequently renewed by agreement between
the insurer and the policyholder, within or without the commonwealth, during the period within
which this premium is effective, or any policy of accident or sickness insurance as described in
section one hundred and eight which provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance
and which is delivered or issued for delivery or subsequently renewed by agreement between the
insurer and the policyholder in the commonwealth, during the period within which this provision
is effective, or any employers' health and welfare fund which provides hospital expense and
surgical expense benefits and which is issued or renewed to any person or group of persons in
the commonwealth, during the period within which this provision is effective, shall provide
coverage for the cost of the rental and usage of a multi-user breast pump by the mother of a
of 9

newborn infant who is receiving care at an intensive care or special care nursery, or has cardiac,
neurological, or oral anomalies that prevent direct feeding at the breast, until such time as the
infant is discharged, or until the mother is no longer pumping breast milk. The multi-user breast
pump should be made available to the user within 24 hours of maternal hospital discharge.
(c) Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued, delivered or
renewed within the commonwealth, which is considered creditable coverage under section 1 of
chapter 111M, shall provide an individual, who is eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump
under this section, coverage for: (i) periodic replacement parts for the multi-user breast pump
including, but not limited to, connectors, valves, tubing, backflow protectors, and flanges; (ii)
breast milk storage bags; and (iii) microwave bags for sterilizing the multi-user breast pump
parts.
(d) Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued, delivered or
renewed within the commonwealth, which is considered creditable coverage under section 1 of
chapter 111M, shall provide an individual, who is eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump
under this section, coverage for: (i) an initial assessment, instruction and fitting by an
International Board Certified Lactation Consultant (IBCLC); and (ii) ongoing assessment,
support and refitting as needed and prescribed by provider, by an IBCLC.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8DDD the following section:-
Section 8EEE. (a) As used in this section, “multi-user breast pump” shall mean a breast
pump that is: (i) capable of initiating and supporting milk supply; (ii) able to be used by multiple
100 users safely and hygienically; (iii) durable enough to be used by a mother who is expressing 8
of 9

101 times per day or more; (iv) is made for heavy usage with a long motor life; (v) operating using a
102 closed system; (vi) is capable of suction power from 0 to 300 mmHg; (vii) has a multiphase
103 system or the ability to customize vacuum and cycling for each user; and (viii) is run on
104 electricity, not batteries alone.
105 (b) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group
106 hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide
107 coverage for the cost of the rental and usage of a multi-user breast pump by the mother of a
108 newborn infant who is receiving care at an intensive care or special care nursery, or has cardiac,
109 neurological, or oral anomalies that prevent direct feeding at the breast, until such time as the
110 infant is discharged, or until the mother is no longer pumping breast milk. The multi-user breast
111 pump shall be made available to the user within 24 hours of maternal hospital discharge.
112 (c) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group
113 hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide
114 an individual, who is eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump under this section, coverage
115 for: (i) periodic replacement parts for the multi-user breast pump including, but not limited to,
116 connectors, valves, tubing, backflow protectors, and flanges; (ii) breast milk storage bags; and
117 (iii) microwave bags for sterilizing the multi-user breast pump parts.
118 (d) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group
119 hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide
120 an individual, who is eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump under this section, coverage
121 for: (i) an initial assessment, instruction and fitting by an International Board Certified Lactation
of 9

122 Consultant (IBCLC); and (ii) ongoing assessment, support and refitting as needed and prescribed
123 by provider, by an IBCLC.
124 SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General laws is hereby amended by inserting after
125 section 4DDD the following section:-
126 Section 4EEE. (a) As used in this section, “multi-user breast pump” shall mean a breast
127 pump that is: (i) capable of initiating and supporting milk supply; (ii) able to be used by multiple
128 users safely and hygienically; (iii) durable enough to be used by a mother who is expressing 8
129 times per day or more; (iv) is made for heavy usage with a long motor life; (v) operating using a
130 closed system; (vi) is capable of suction power from 0 to 300 mmHg; (vii) has a multiphase
131 system or the ability to customize vacuum and cycling for each user; and (viii) is run on
132 electricity, not batteries alone.
133 (b) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement
134 delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage for the cost of the
135 rental and usage of a multi-user breast pump by the mother of a newborn infant who is receiving
136 care at an intensive care or special care nursery, or has cardiac, neurological, or oral anomalies
137 that prevent direct feeding at the breast, until such time as the infant is discharged, or until the
138 mother is no longer pumping breastmilk. The multi-user breast pump should be made available
139 to the user within 24 hours of maternal hospital discharge.
140 (c) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement
141 delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide an individual, who is
142 eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump under this section, coverage for: (i) periodic
143 replacement parts for the multi-user breast pump including, but not limited to, connectors,
of 9

144 valves, tubing, backflow protectors, and flanges; (ii) breast milk storage bags; and (iii)
145 microwave bags for sterilizing the multi-user breast pump parts.
146 (d) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement
147 delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide an individual, who is
148 eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump under this section, coverage for: (i) an initial
149 assessment, instruction and fitting by an International Board Certified Lactation Consultant
150 (IBCLC); and (ii) ongoing assessment, support and refitting as needed and prescribed by
151 provider, by an IBCLC.
152 SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
153 section 4VV the following section:-
154 Section 4WW. (a) As used in this section, “multi-user breast pump” shall mean a breast
155 pump that is: (i) capable of initiating and supporting milk supply; (ii) able to be used by multiple
156 users safely and hygienically; (iii) durable enough to be used by a mother who is expressing 8
157 times per day or more; (iv) is made for heavy usage with a long motor life; (v) operating using a
158 closed system; (vi) is capable of suction power from 0 to 300 mmHg; (vii) has a multiphase
159 system or the ability to customize vacuum and cycling for each user; and (viii) is run on
160 electricity, not batteries alone.
161 (b) An individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or renewed shall
162 provide coverage for the cost of the rental and usage of a multi-user breast pump by the mother
163 of a newborn infant who is receiving care at an intensive care or special care nursery, or has
164 cardiac, neurological, or oral anomalies that prevent direct feeding at the breast, until such time
of 9

165 as the infant is discharged, or until the mother is no longer pumping breastmilk. The multi-user
166 breast pump should be made available to the user within 24 hours of maternal hospital discharge.
167 (c) An individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or renewed shall
168 provide an individual, who is eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump under this section,
169 coverage for: (i) periodic replacement parts for the multi-user breast pump including, but not
170 limited to, connectors, valves, tubing, backflow protectors, and flanges; (ii) breast milk storage
171 bags; and (iii) microwave bags for sterilizing the multi-user breast pump parts.
172 (d) An individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or renewed shall
173 provide an individual, who is eligible for a covered multi-user breast pump under this section,
174 coverage for: (i) an initial assessment, instruction and fitting by an International Board Certified
175 Lactation Consultant (IBCLC); and (ii) ongoing assessment, support and refitting as needed and
176 prescribed by provider, by an IBCLC.
of 9